Utah statutes.
32A-12-303 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Tampering with records.

(1)  Any official or employee of the commission or the department who has custody of any writing or record required to be filed or deposited with the commission or the department under this title, and who steals, falsifies, alters, willfully destroys, mutilates, defaces, removes, or conceals in whole or in part that writing or record, or who knowingly permits any other person to do so, is guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  Any person not an official or employee of the commission or the department who commits any of the acts specified in Subsection (1) is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

